Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-242
Graduation credits; award of diploma.

An option school district shall accept credits toward graduation that were awarded by another school district. The option school district shall award a diploma to an option student if the student meets its graduation requirements.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3412;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 46.